Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. State and Local Funds.

§ 22.1-88.
Of what school funds to consist.

The funds available to the school board of a school division for the establishment, support and maintenance of the public schools in the school division shall consist of state funds appropriated for public school purposes and apportioned to the school board, federal funds appropriated for educational purposes and apportioned to the school board, local funds appropriated to the school board by a local governing body or such funds as shall be raised by local levy as authorized by law, donations or the income arising therefrom, and any other funds that may be set apart for public school purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-116; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 162; 1980, c. 559; 1988, c. 576.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision relating to local school taxes, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 2.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

There is no express grant of authority for a local school board to make loans

to the Board of Supervisors nor can any such authority be reasonably or fairly implied. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Franklin P. Slavin, Jr., County Attorney for Bland County, 04-074, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 57 (10/19/04).

§ 22.1-89.
Management of funds.

Each school board shall manage and control the funds made available to the school board for public schools and may incur costs and expenses. If funds are appropriated to the school board by major classification as provided in § 22.1-94, no funds shall be expended by the school board except in accordance with such classifications without the consent of the governing body appropriating the funds.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-72, 22-97, 22-127; 1954, cc. 289, 291; 1956, Ex. Sess., cc. 60, 67; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 691; 1968, cc. 501, 614; 1970, c. 71; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 161, 162; 1972, c. 511; 1975, cc. 308, 328, 443; 1978, c. 551; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-89.1.
Management of cafeteria funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law including, but not limited to this article, §§

15.2-2503

and

15.2-2506

, a school board may, in its discretion, establish a decentralized system for management and control of cafeteria funds without including in its annual budget an estimate of the total amount of such decentralized cafeteria funds, or receiving an appropriation of these decentralized cafeteria funds from the local governing body.

All decentralized cafeteria funds shall continue to be audited as required by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to his authority under § 22.1-24 and by the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to his authority under §

15.2-2511

.

History.

1984, c. 138.

§ 22.1-89.2.
Financial records retention and disposition schedule.

School boards shall retain and dispose of financial records in accordance with the regulations concerning financial records retention and disposition promulgated pursuant to the Virginia Public Records Act (§

42.1-76

et seq.) by the State Library Board.
However, school boards shall not be required to retain any such records pertaining to nonappropriated school activity funds for longer than five years.

History.

1990, c. 451.

§ 22.1-89.3.
(Repealed) Funds from telephone service or credit cards.

History.

1998, c. 595; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 22.1-89.4.
Certain policy required; partnerships and sponsorships.

Each school board shall develop and implement, and may, from time to time, revise, a policy relating to commercial, promotional, and corporate partnerships and sponsorships involving the public schools within the division.

History.

2001, c. 467.

§ 22.1-90.
Annual report of expenditures.

Every school board shall submit at least once each year to the governing body or bodies appropriating funds to the school board a report of all its expenditures. Such report shall also be made available to the public either on the official school division website, if any, or in hard copy at the central school division office, on a template prescribed by the Board of Education.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-97; 1954, c. 291; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 501; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1978, c. 430; 1980, c. 559; 2009, c. 104.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 104 added the last sentence.

§ 22.1-90.1.
Inclusion of instructional spending in the School Performance Report Card.

The Department shall include in the annual School Performance Report Card for school divisions the percentage of each division’s annual operating budget allocated to instructional costs. For this purpose, the Department shall (i) establish a methodology for allocating each school division’s expenditures to instructional and noninstructional costs in a manner that, except in the case of the hardware necessary to support electronic textbooks, is consistent with the funding of the Standards of Quality as approved by the General Assembly and (ii) allocate to instructional costs each school division’s expenditures on the hardware necessary to support electronic textbooks. Further, at the discretion of the Superintendent, the Department may also report on other methods of measuring instructional spending such as those used by the U.S. Census Bureau and the U.S. Department of Education.

History.

2012, c. 212; 2015, c. 563.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 563, in the second sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation and “except in the case of the hardware necessary to support electronic textbooks” and added “and (ii) allocate to instructional costs each school division’s expenditures on the hardware necessary to support electronic textbooks” at the end.

§ 22.1-91.
Limitation on expenditures; penalty.

No school board shall expend or contract to expend, in any fiscal year, any sum of money in excess of the funds available for school purposes for that fiscal year without the consent of the governing body or bodies appropriating funds to the school board. Any member of a school board or any division superintendent or other school officer violating, causing to be violated or voting to violate any provision of this section shall be guilty of malfeasance in office.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-120; 1980, c. 559.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

§ 22.1-92.
Estimate of moneys needed for public schools; notice of costs to be distributed.

It shall be the duty of each division superintendent to prepare, with the approval of the school board, and submit to the governing body or bodies appropriating funds for the school division, by the date specified in §

15.2-2503

, the estimate of the amount of money deemed to be needed during the next fiscal year for the support of the public schools of the school division. The estimate shall set up the amount of money deemed to be needed for each major classification prescribed by the Board of Education and such other headings or items as may be necessary.Upon preparing the estimate of the amount of money deemed to be needed during the next fiscal year for the support of the public schools of the school division, each division superintendent shall also prepare and distribute, within a reasonable time as prescribed by the Board of Education, notification of the estimated average per pupil cost for public education in the school division for the coming school year in accordance with the budget estimates provided to the local governing body or bodies. Such notification shall also include actual per pupil state and local education expenditures for the previous school year. The notice may also include federal funds expended for public education in the school division.The notice shall be made available in a form provided by the Department of Education and shall be published on the school division’s website or in hard copy upon request. To promote uniformity and allow for comparisons, the Department of Education shall develop a form for this notice and distribute such form to the school divisions for publication.

Before any school board gives final approval to its budget for submission to the governing body, the school board shall hold at least one public hearing to receive the views of citizens within the school division. A school board shall cause public notice to be given at least 10 days prior to any hearing by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation within the school division. The passage of the budget by the local government shall be conclusive evidence of compliance with the requirements of this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-120.3, 22-120.5; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1980, c. 559; 1986, c. 282; 1994, cc. 453, 788; 2011, c. 216; 2012, cc. 805, 836.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 216 rewrote the last paragraph in subsection A, which read: “The notice shall be printed on a form prescribed by the Board of Education and shall be distributed separately or with any other materials being currently transmitted to the parents, guardians or other persons having control or charge of students. To promote uniformity and allow for comparisons, the Board of Education shall develop a one-page form for this notice and distribute such form to the school superintendents for duplication and distribution.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 27.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 805 and 836 are identical, and deleted “to each parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of a child enrolled in the relevant school division” following “the coming school year” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A; and made a stylistic change.

§ 22.1-93.
Approval of annual budget for school purposes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including but not limited to Chapter 25 (§

15.2-2500

et seq.) of Title 15.2, the governing body of a county and the governing body of a municipality shall each prepare and approve an annual budget for educational purposes by May 15 or within 30 days of the receipt by the county or municipality of the estimates of state funds, whichever shall later occur. Upon approval, each local school division shall publish the approved annual budget in line item form, including the estimated required local match, on the division’s website, and the document shall also be made available in hard copy as needed to citizens for inspection.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, no later than the fifteenth day following final adjournment of the Virginia General Assembly in each session, submit estimates to be used for budgetary purposes relative to the Basic School Aid Formula to each school division and to the local governing body of each county, city and town that operates a separate school division. Such estimates shall be for each year of the next biennium or for the then next fiscal year.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-127; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 67; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 614; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 162; 1975, c. 443; 1978, c. 551; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 541; 2008, cc. 353, 404; 2009, c. 280; 2011, c. 216; 2015, cc. 143, 370, 371.

Cross references.

As to publication and notice of public hearing upon approval of school division budgets, see §

15.2-2506

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 353 and 404, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2009.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 353 and 404, effective January 1, 2009, are identical, and added the last sentence to the first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 280 inserted “including the estimated required local match” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 216 substituted “on the division’s website, and the document shall also be made available” for “on the division’s website, if any, or if there is no division website, the document shall otherwise be made available” in the last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 143 and 370 are nearly identical, and deleted “shall prepare and approve an annual budget for educational purposes by May first or within thirty days of the receipt by the county of the estimates of state funds, whichever shall later occur” following “governing body of a county,” inserted “each” and “county or” and made minor stylistic changes in the first paragraph.

The 2015 amendment by c. 371 inserted “in line item form” preceding “including” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

§ 22.1-94.
Appropriations by county, city or town governing body for public schools.

A governing body may make appropriations to a school board from the funds derived from local levies and from any other funds available, for operation, capital outlay and debt service in the public schools. Such appropriations shall be not less than the cost apportioned to the governing body for maintaining an educational program meeting the standards of quality for the several school divisions prescribed as provided by law. The amount appropriated by the governing body for public schools shall relate to its total only or to such major classifications prescribed by the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-115. The appropriations may be made on the same periodic basis as the governing body makes appropriations to other departments and agencies.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-127; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 67; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1968, c. 614; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 162; 1975, c. 443; 1978, c. 551; 1980, c. 559; 1989, c. 94.

§ 22.1-95.
Duty to levy school tax.

Each county, city and town is authorized, directed and required to raise money by a tax on all property subject to local taxation at such rate as will insure a sum which, together with other available funds, will provide that portion of the cost apportioned to such county, city or town by law for maintaining an educational program meeting the standards of quality for the several school divisions prescribed as provided by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-126.1; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 162; 1980, c. 559.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 2.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 25.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Physical condition of schools. —

Remedies for inequality in public education, whether arising from poor school physical plant conditions or otherwise, are available under the mandates of the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution; the Civil Rights Act of 1964; the Equal Educational Opportunities Act of 1974; and Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, which collectively prohibit discrimination on the basis of race and sex. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William M. Stanley, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-046, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (1/4/19).

The general assembly has enacted state laws that make local school boards primarily responsible for constructing and renovating school buildings in Virginia. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William M. Stanley, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-046, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 2 (1/4/19).

Capital expenditures, “indebtedness,” and “rent.”

County Board of Supervisors may levy special school tax as a special county tax to fund capital expenditures or payment of indebtedness or rent. See opinion of Attorney General to Michelle R. Robl, County Attorney, Prince William County, 20-029, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (5/14/21).

§ 22.1-96.
Proration of operating cost, expenditures for capital outlay purposes and indebtedness for construction of buildings in certain school divisions.

In a school division composed of part or all of more than one county or city, the operating cost as well as the expenditures for capital outlay purposes and indebtedness for the construction of school buildings shall be on a pro rata basis on enrollment of pupils unless some other basis is agreed upon by the division school board and the governing bodies of the participating counties and cities.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-100.9; 1954, c. 391; 1956, c. 671; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-97.
Calculation and reporting of required local expenditures; procedure if locality fails to appropriate sufficient educational funds.

The Department of Education shall collect annually the data necessary to make calculations and reports required by this subsection.At the beginning of each school year, the Department shall make calculations to ensure that each school division has appropriated sufficient funds to support its estimated required local expenditure for providing an educational program meeting the prescribed Standards of Quality, required by Article VIII of the Constitution of Virginia and Chapter 13.2 (§ 22.1-253.13:1 et seq.) of this title. At the conclusion of the school year, the Department shall make calculations to verify whether the locality has provided the required expenditure, based on average daily membership as of March 31 of the relevant school year.The Department shall report annually to the House Committees on Education and Appropriations and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health the results of such calculations and the degree to which each school division has met, failed to meet, or surpassed its required expenditure.The Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall report annually to the House Committees on Education and Appropriations and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health the state expenditure provided each locality for an educational program meeting the Standards of Quality.The Department and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall coordinate to ensure that their respective reports are based upon comparable data and are delivered together, or as closely following one another as practicable, to the appropriate standing committees.

Whenever such calculations indicate that the governing body of a county, city or town fails or refuses to appropriate funds sufficient to provide that portion of the cost apportioned to such county, city or town by law for maintaining an educational program meeting the Standards of Quality, the Board of Education shall notify the Attorney General of such failure or refusal in writing signed by the president of the Board. Upon receipt of such notification, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to file in the circuit court for the county, city or town a petition for a writ of mandamus directing and requiring such governing body to make forthwith such appropriation as is required by law.The petition shall be in the name of the Board of Education, and the governing body shall be made a party defendant thereto. The court may, in its discretion, cause such other officers or persons to be made parties defendant as it may deem proper. The court may make such order as may be appropriate respecting the employment and compensation of an attorney or attorneys for any party defendant not otherwise represented by counsel. The petition shall be given first priority on the docket of such court and shall be heard expeditiously in accordance with the procedures prescribed in Article 2 (§

8.01-644

et seq.) of Chapter 25 of Title 8.01 and the writ of mandamus shall be awarded or denied according to the law and facts of the case and with or without costs, as the court may determine. The order of the court shall be final upon entry. Any appeal therefrom shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the Court of Appeals.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-21.2; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 160; 1980, c. 559; 2003, c. 948; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Education and Health” for “Senate Committees on Finance and Education and Health.” March 10, 2021.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 948 added subsection A; inserted the subsection B designation, and in the first sentence of the first paragraph of subsection B, inserted “such calculations indicate that” near the beginning, and deleted “for the several school divisions prescribed as provided by law” following “Standards of Quality.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court next after habeas corpus cases already on the docket” in subsection B in the second paragraph.

§ 22.1-98.
Reduction of state aid when length of school term below 180 days or 990 hours.

For the purposes of this section:“Declared state of emergency” means the declaration of an emergency before or after an event, by the Governor or by officials in a locality, that requires the closure of any or all schools within a school division.“Severe weather conditions or other emergency situations” means those circumstances presenting a threat to the health or safety of students that result from severe weather conditions or other emergencies, including natural and man-made disasters, energy shortages, or power failures.

Except as provided in this section:

The length of every school’s term in every school division shall be at least 180 teaching days or 990 teaching hours in any school year; and

If the length of the term of any school or the schools in a school division shall be less than 180 teaching days or 990 teaching hours in any school year, the amount paid by the Commonwealth from the Basic School Aid Fund shall, except as otherwise hereinafter provided or as otherwise provided by law, be reduced in the same proportion as the length of the school term has been reduced in any school or the schools in the school division from 180 teaching days or 990 teaching hours.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection B, in any case in which severe weather conditions or other emergency situations result in the closing of a school or the schools in a school division or in an unscheduled remote learning day for a school or the schools in a school division, the amount paid by the Commonwealth from the Basic School Aid Fund shall not be reduced if one of the following methods of make-up days, make-up hours, or unscheduled remote learning days, as appropriate in the circumstances, is followed:

When severe weather conditions or other emergency situations have resulted in the closing of a school or the schools in a school division for five or fewer days, the school or the schools in the school division shall make up all missed days by adding teaching days to the school calendar or extending the length of the school day;

When severe weather conditions or other emergency situations have resulted in the closing of a school or the schools in a school division for six days or more, the school or the schools in the school division shall make up the first five days plus one day for each two days missed in excess of the first five by adding teaching days to the school calendar or extending the length of the school day;

When severe weather conditions or other emergency situations have resulted in the closing of any school in a school division and such school has been unable to meet the 180 teaching day requirement, the school division may make up the missed teaching days by providing its students with instructional hours equivalent to such missed teaching days to meet the minimum 990 teaching hour requirement; or

When severe weather conditions or other emergency situations have resulted in the closing of any school in a school division for in-person instruction, the school division may declare an unscheduled remote learning day whereby the school provides instruction and student services that are consistent with guidelines established by the Department of Education to ensure the equitable provision of such services. No school division shall claim more than 10 unscheduled remote learning days in a school year unless the Superintendent of Public Instruction grants an extension.

The local appropriations for educational purposes necessary to fund 180 teaching days or 990 teaching hours shall also not be proportionally reduced by any local governing body because of any reduction in the length of the term of any school or the schools in a school division authorized by subsection C.

The foregoing provisions of this section notwithstanding, the Board of Education may waive the requirement that school divisions provide additional teaching days or teaching hours to compensate for school closings resulting from a declared state of emergency or severe weather conditions or other emergency situations. If the local school board desires a waiver, it shall submit a request to the Board of Education. The request shall include evidence of efforts that have been made by the school division to reschedule as many days as possible and certification by the division superintendent and chairman of the local school board that every reasonable effort for making up lost teaching days or teaching hours was exhausted before requesting a waiver of this requirement. If the waiver is denied, the school division shall make up the missed instructional time in accordance with this section.If the Board grants such a waiver, there shall be no proportionate reduction in the amount paid by the Commonwealth from the Basic School Aid Fund. Further, the local appropriations for educational purposes necessary to fund 180 teaching days or 990 teaching hours shall not be proportionally reduced by any local governing body due to any reduction in the length of the term of any school or the schools in a school division permitted by such waiver.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Board of Education shall waive the requirement that school divisions provide additional teaching days or teaching hours to compensate for school closings resulting from an evacuation directed and compelled by the Governor pursuant to §

44-146.17

for up to five teaching days. If the local school board desires such a waiver, it shall notify the Board of Education and provide evidence of efforts that have been made by the school division to reschedule as many days as possible and certification by the division superintendent and chairman of the local school board that every reasonable effort for making up lost teaching days or teaching hours was exhausted. After receiving such notification, the Board shall grant the waiver and there shall be no proportionate reduction in the amount paid by the Commonwealth from the Basic School Aid Fund. Further, the local appropriations for educational purposes necessary to fund 180 teaching days or 990 teaching hours shall not be proportionally reduced by any local governing body due to any reduction in the length of the term of any school or the schools in a school division permitted by such waiver.

If the professional personnel of any such school division actually render service for less than the contracted period for such school year and their compensation is reduced because of insufficient funds or other reason, the proportionate amount paid by the Commonwealth for the personnel component of the Basic School Aid Fund for such school year shall be reduced pro rata.Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the school board of any school division in which the length of the term for any school or for the schools in the school division is reduced as provided in this section may pay its professional personnel such salary as they would have received if the term had not been so reduced.

In developing the school calendar as provided for in § 22.1-79.1, each local school board shall establish such calendars and teaching contracts in accordance with applicable regulations of the Board of Education to include contingencies for making up teaching days and teaching hours missed for emergency situations described in this section. Historical data shall be used to determine the needs of the locality including scheduled holidays and breaks and work days.

The Board of Education may authorize the Superintendent of Public Instruction to approve, in compliance with this section, reductions in the school term for a school or the schools in a school division without a proportionate reduction in the amount paid by the Commonwealth from the Basic School Aid Fund.

With the exception of the Basic School Aid Fund as provided for above, the Commonwealth shall not distribute funds to a locality for costs not incurred when the school term is reduced below 180 teaching days or 990 teaching hours.

As part of the annual report required by § 22.1-81, the division superintendent and local school board chairman shall certify the total number of teaching days and teaching hours each year.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-5; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 66; 1977, c. 316; 1978, cc. 105, 204; 1979, c. 177; 1980, c. 559; 1987, c. 65; 1988, c. 112; 1990, c. 213; 2004, cc. 839, 868, 887; 2006, cc. 26, 96; 2015, c. 706; 2019, cc. 644, 645; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 19, 293.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1987, c. 65, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1988, c. 708 cl. 2, provided: “That the amendments included in this act shall expire on July 1, 1990, and the law shall continue in force as it existed prior to this enactment.” However, Acts 1990, cc. 189 and 213 repealed the expiration.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 839, effective April 14, 2004, inserted the third paragraph [similar to present subsection E] and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 868 and 887, effective April 15, 2004, are nearly identical, and rewrote the section.

This section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 26 and 96 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “and the Board of Education’s implementing regulations” from the end of subsection A; added subdivision A 1; inserted the subdivision A 2 designation; deleted “and the implementing regulations of the Board of Education” from the end of subsection B; inserted “at least” in subdivision B 1; substituted “is followed” for “shall be followed” at the end of subsection C; in subdivision C 1, substituted “five or fewer” for “less than five,”
“all missed” for “such,” “by adding teaching days to the school calendar or extending the length of the school day” for “as may be required by the Board’s regulations however the required make up days shall not exceed the missed teaching days”; in subdivision C 2, substituted “six days or more” for “five days, but no more than 15 days,” and “by adding teaching days to the school calendar or extending the length of the school day; or” for “up to a maximum of nine make-up days”; deleted former subdivision C 3 relating to severe weather lasting 15 days or more; redesignated former subdivision C 4 as subdivision C 3, deleted “or 990 teaching hour” following “the 180 teaching day” and added “to meet the minimum 990 teaching hour requirement” at the end; added the last three sentences of subsection E; deleted “and the Board’s implementing regulations” following “provided in this section” in the second paragraph of subsection F; rewrote subsection G; deleted “shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) to implement this section. The Board’s regulations” near the beginning of subsection H; and added subsection J.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 706 added “declared state of emergency or severe weather conditions or other emergency situations” at the end of the first sentence of subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and in subdivision A 2, deleted “but not limited to” following “including”; added subsection F and made related changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 19 and 293, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and removed the designations for subdivisions A 1 and 2; rewrote the introductory language of subdivision C, which read: “Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection B, in any case in which severe weather conditions or other emergency situations, as defined in this section, result in the closing of a school or the schools in a school division, the amount paid by the Commonwealth from the Basic School Aid Fund shall not be reduced if the following schedule of make-up days is followed”; added subdivision C 4; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-98.1.
Extended School Year Incentive Program.

From such funds as may be appropriated for such purpose and from such gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds as may be received on its behalf, there is hereby established the Extended School Year Incentive Program, hereinafter referred to as the “Program,” to be administered by the Board of Education.

In accordance with the appropriation act, any funds appropriated or otherwise provided for the Program shall be disbursed to award incentive grants to public school divisions for the operation of schools beyond the 180-day school year or 990 hours in any school year as required by § 22.1-98 and the Standards of Accreditation. However, the grants shall not be awarded to support summer school initiatives.

History.

2000, c. 858.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 858, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the 2000 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2000 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor.”
An appropriation of $400,000 was made in Item 143 c 8 g of Acts 2000, c. 1073, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 814, for FY 2000-2001.